Maine, session 132, LD1714.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1254, sub-§3-A is enacted to read:
3-A. School buses. The Secretary of State may issue a license specifically endorsed
for the operation of a school bus as defined in section 2301, subsection 5 with the same
requirements as a motor vehicle license and that conforms with the requirements of the
federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986 without requiring the license holder
to obtain a commercial license under section 1253. A motor vehicle license does not
authorize operation of a school bus unless the license is endorsed for that vehicle. This
subsection does not prohibit a commercial license holder with a school bus endorsement
and who is otherwise qualified to operate a school bus from operating a school bus in the
State.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1304, sub-§4-B is enacted to read:
4-B. School bus learner's permit. The following provisions apply to school bus
learner's permits.
A. The school bus learner's permit holder must be at all times accompanied in a school
bus by the holder of a valid school bus license under section 1254, subsection 3-A or a
commercial driver's license with a school bus endorsement under subsection 4-A,
paragraph E, subparagraph (2). The school bus license holder or commercial driver's
license holder shall at all times be directly behind or in the first row behind the driver
or, in the case of a passenger vehicle, be physically present in the front seat of the
vehicle next to the school bus learner's permit holder.
B. The school bus learner's permit holder must hold a valid Maine driver's license.
C. In order to receive a license specifically endorsed for the operation of a school bus,
in accordance with the requirements of the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety
Act of 1986, a school bus learner's permit holder must have taken and passed the school
bus endorsement knowledge test. A school bus learner's permit holder testing for a
license specifically endorsed for the operation of a school bus is prohibited from
operating a school bus with passengers other than test examiners and the school bus
license holder or commercial driver's license holder with a school bus endorsement
accompanying the school bus learner's permit holder pursuant to paragraph A. A school
bus learner's permit holder must be at least 21 years of age to apply for a permit under
this subsection. The school bus learner's permit holder must be accompanied by a
school bus license holder or commercial driver's license holder with a school bus
endorsement who has at least 3 years of driving experience and is at least 22 years of
age.
D. The school bus learner's permit is valid for no more than one year from the date of
issuance.
E. The issuance of a school bus learner's permit is a precondition to the initial issuance
of a license specifically endorsed for the operation of a school bus.
F. The school bus learner's permit holder must complete a school bus driver's license
skills course and is not eligible to take the school bus driver's license skills test in the
first 14 days after the initial issuance of the school bus learner's permit.
Page 1 - 132LR0778(01)

G. An instructor of a school bus driver's license skills course must be a school bus
license holder or commercial driver's license holder with a school bus endorsement
who has at least 3 years of school bus driving experience and is at least 22 years of age.
An instructor of a school bus driver's license skills course must have completed a
school bus driver's license skills instructor course approved by the department, which
may be offered in conjunction with a commercial driver's license instructor course.
For purposes of this subsection, "school bus" has the same meaning as in section 2301,
subsection 5.